Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1854.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7722(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 7722. Designation of snowmobile and ATV roads.(a) [General rule] Authority of department.--The Department of Transportation [on State-designated highways and local authorities on any highway, road or street within its jurisdiction] may designate any State-designated highway[, road or street within its jurisdiction] as a snowmobile road, an ATV road, or both, and may, in its discretion, determine whether such road shall be closed to vehicular traffic or whether snowmobiles and ATVs may share this designated road with vehicular traffic.123456789101112131415161718 (a.1) Authority of local authorities.--A local authority may designate any highway, including a State-designated highway, within the physical boundaries of the local authority as a snowmobile road, an ATV road, or both, and may, in the local authority's discretion, determine whether such road shall be closed to vehicular traffic or whether snowmobiles and ATVs may share this designated road with vehicular traffic, subject to the following:(1) A local authority may not designate a limited access highway as a snowmobile road, an ATV road, or both, unless such designation is approved by the Department of Transportation.(2) A local authority may not close a State-designated highway to vehicular traffic unless the closure is approved by the Department of Transportation.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1854PN2289 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617